South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3855.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) small arms and small arms ammunition. As used in this item: (a) "Small arms" means any portable firearm, designed to be carried and operated by a single person including, but not limited to, rifles, shotguns, pistols, and revolvers, with no barrel greater than an internal diameter of .50 caliber or a shotgun of ten gauge or smaller. (b) "Small arms ammunition" means firearm ammunition designed for use in small arms. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----